Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1820YH (2) 91 dg/ko H.F. 342 Section 1. Section 237A.13, subsection 8, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Persons deemed to be eligible for 3 benefits under the state child care assistance program in 4 accordance with section 237A.13A. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 237A.13A State child care assistance 6 ââ child care personnel. 7 1. Notwithstanding section 237A.13, subsections 1 and 2, 8 a child shall be eligible for the state child care assistance 9 program under section 237A.13 if a parent, guardian, or 10 custodian meets the following requirements: 11 a. The parent, guardian, or custodian is employed at 12 a child care facility, a child care home registered with 13 the department, or an unregistered child care home with an 14 agreement with the department to accept reimbursements from the 15 state child care assistance program. 16 b. The parent, guardian, or custodian works an average 17 minimum of thirty-two hours per week during the month in 18 a position with a primary duty of providing child care 19 directly to children, and is regularly counted in the minimum 20 child-to-staff ratio established by the department by rule. 21 c. If the parent, guardian, or custodian is employed at 22 a child care home or a child development home, the parent, 23 guardian, or custodian does not provide child care to the 24 parent, guardian, or custodianâs own child. A co-provider 25 at a child development home may qualify for state child care 26 assistance if such person meets all requirements set by this 27 section and by the department by rule. 28 d. The parent, guardian, or custodian is not a substitute or 29 an assistant at a child development home. 30 e. Based on the departmentâs evaluation of the parent, 31 guardian, or custodianâs application for state child care 32 assistance, the department has determined the parent, guardian, 33 or custodian has a need for child care. 34 2. A director, co-director, or other administrative 35 -1- LSB 1820YH (2) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 342 staff member of a child care facility may qualify for state 1 child care assistance pursuant to subsection 1 if such person 2 is regularly counted in the minimum child-to-staff ratio 3 established by the department by rule. 4 3. A person participating in the state child care assistance 5 program pursuant to eligibility established under this section 6 shall make copayments based on the personâs household income 7 for services received from the program. 8 4. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 9 to implement and administer this section. 10